static/hunspell/05.11.2023/udm.aff
FLAG long
SFX N3 Y 409 # для неодушевленных сущ. оканч-ся на -ие -ия (Россия, предприятие)
SFX N3 я 0 ия
SFX N3 е 0 ие
SFX N3 я е ия
SFX N3 е ед ие
SFX N3 я ед ия
SFX N3 е ез ие
SFX N3 я ез ия
SFX N3 е мы ие
SFX N3 я мы ия
SFX N3 е ды ие
SFX N3 я ды ия
SFX N3 е зы ие
SFX N3 я зы ия
SFX N3 е ме ие
SFX N3 я ме ия
SFX N3 е мес ие
SFX N3 я мес ия
SFX N3 е дэ ие
SFX N3 я дэ ия
SFX N3 е дэс ие
SFX N3 я дэс ия
SFX N3 е зэ ие
SFX N3 я зэ ия
SFX N3 е зэс ие
SFX N3 я зэс ия
SFX N3 е лэн ие
SFX N3 я лэн ия
SFX N3 е елэн ие
SFX N3 я елэн ия
SFX N3 е едлэн ие
SFX N3 я едлэн ия
SFX N3 е езлэн ие
SFX N3 я езлэн ия
SFX N3 е мылэн ие
SFX N3 я мылэн ия
SFX N3 е дылэн ие
SFX N3 я дылэн ия
SFX N3 е зылэн ие
SFX N3 я зылэн ия
SFX N3 е лэсь ие
SFX N3 я лэсь ия
SFX N3 е лэсьсэ ие
SFX N3 я лэсьсэ ия
SFX N3 е елэсь ие
SFX N3 я елэсь ия
SFX N3 е едлэсь ие
SFX N3 я едлэсь ия
SFX N3 е езлэсь ие
SFX N3 я езлэсь ия
SFX N3 е мылэсь ие
SFX N3 я мылэсь ия
SFX N3 е дылэсь ие
SFX N3 я дылэсь ия
SFX N3 е зылэсь ие
SFX N3 я зылэсь ия
SFX N3 е лы ие
SFX N3 я лы ия
SFX N3 е елы ие
SFX N3 я елы ия
SFX N3 е едлы ие
SFX N3 я едлы ия
SFX N3 е езлы ие
SFX N3 я езлы ия
SFX N3 е мылы ие
SFX N3 я мылы ия
SFX N3 е дылы ие
SFX N3 я дылы ия
SFX N3 е зылы ие
SFX N3 я зылы ия
SFX N3 е тэк ие
SFX N3 я тэк ия
SFX N3 е етэк ие
SFX N3 я етэк ия
SFX N3 е едтэк ие
SFX N3 я едтэк ия
SFX N3 е езтэк ие
SFX N3 я езтэк ия
SFX N3 е мытэк ие
SFX N3 я мытэк ия
SFX N3 0 мытэк .
SFX N3 е дытэк ие
SFX N3 я дытэк ия
SFX N3 е зытэк ие
SFX N3 я зытэк ия
SFX N3 0 я ия
SFX N3 0 я ие
SFX N3 0 дъя ие
SFX N3 0 зъя ие
SFX N3 я ея ия
SFX N3 я едъя ия
SFX N3 я езъя ия
SFX N3 е мыя ие
SFX N3 я мыя ия
SFX N3 е дыя ие
SFX N3 я дыя ия
SFX N3 е зыя ие
SFX N3 я зыя ия
SFX N3 е ен ие
SFX N3 я ен ия
SFX N3 е еным ие
SFX N3 я еным ия
SFX N3 е енымы ие
SFX N3 я енымы ия
SFX N3 е еныд ие
SFX N3 я еныд ия
SFX N3 е еныды ие
SFX N3 я еныды ия
SFX N3 е еныз ие
SFX N3 я еныз ия
SFX N3 е енызы ие
SFX N3 я енызы ия
SFX N3 е ын ие #местн.п. + входн.п.
SFX N3 я ын ия
SFX N3 е ынлэсь ие
SFX N3 я ынлэсь ия
SFX N3 е ям ие
SFX N3 я ям ия
SFX N3 е ямы ие
SFX N3 я ямы ия
SFX N3 е яд ие
SFX N3 я яд ия
SFX N3 е яды ие
SFX N3 я яды ия
SFX N3 е яз ие
SFX N3 я яз ия
SFX N3 е язы ие
SFX N3 я язы ия
SFX N3 е ысь/G1N1 ие #исходн.п.
SFX N3 я ысь/G1N1 ия
SFX N3 е ысьтым ие
SFX N3 я ысьтым ия
SFX N3 е ысьтымы ие
SFX N3 я ысьтымы ия
SFX N3 е ысьтыд ие
SFX N3 я ысьтыд ия
SFX N3 е ысьтыды ие
SFX N3 я ысьтыды ия
SFX N3 е ысьтыз ие
SFX N3 я ысьтыз ия
SFX N3 е ысьтызы ие
SFX N3 я ысьтызы ия
SFX N3 е ысьсэ ие
SFX N3 я ысьсэ ия
SFX N3 е ысен ие #отдал.п.
SFX N3 я ысен ия
SFX N3 е ысез ие
SFX N3 я ысез ия
SFX N3 е ысеным ие
SFX N3 я ысеным ия
SFX N3 е ысеныд ие
SFX N3 я ысеныд ия
SFX N3 е ысеныз ие
SFX N3 я ысеныз ия
SFX N3 е етӥ ие #перех.п.
SFX N3 я етӥ ия
SFX N3 е етӥм ие
SFX N3 я етӥм ия
SFX N3 е етӥд ие
SFX N3 я етӥд ия
SFX N3 е етӥз ие
SFX N3 я етӥз ия
SFX N3 е етӥмы ие
SFX N3 я етӥмы ия
SFX N3 е етӥды ие
SFX N3 я етӥды ия
SFX N3 е етӥзы ие
SFX N3 я етӥзы ия
SFX N3 е елань ие #направ.п.
SFX N3 я елань ия
SFX N3 е едлань ие
SFX N3 я едлань ия
SFX N3 е езлань ие
SFX N3 я езлань ия
SFX N3 е мылань ие
SFX N3 я мылань ия
SFX N3 е дылань ие
SFX N3 я дылань ия
SFX N3 е зылань ие
SFX N3 я зылань ия
SFX N3 е ёзь ие #предельн.п.
SFX N3 я ёзь ия
SFX N3 е еозь ие
SFX N3 я еозь ия
SFX N3 я едозь ия
SFX N3 е едозь ие
SFX N3 е езозь ие
SFX N3 я езозь ия
SFX N3 е ёзям ие
SFX N3 я ёзям ия
SFX N3 е ёзяд ие
SFX N3 я ёзяд ия
SFX N3 е ёзяз ие
SFX N3 я ёзяз ия
SFX N3 е мыозь ие
SFX N3 я мыозь ия
SFX N3 е дыозь ие
SFX N3 я дыозь ия
SFX N3 е зыозь ие
SFX N3 я зыозь ия
SFX N3 е ос ие # МН.ч. им.п.
SFX N3 я ос ия
SFX N3 е ос ие
SFX N3 я ос ия
SFX N3 е осы ие
SFX N3 я осы ия
SFX N3 е осыд ие
SFX N3 я осыд ия
SFX N3 е осыз ие
SFX N3 я осыз ия
SFX N3 е осмы ие
SFX N3 я осмы ия
SFX N3 е осты ие
SFX N3 я осты ия
SFX N3 е оссы ие
SFX N3 я оссы ия
SFX N3 е осме ие
SFX N3 я осме ия
SFX N3 е осмес ие
SFX N3 я осмес ия
SFX N3 е остэ ие
SFX N3 я остэ ия
SFX N3 е остэс ие
SFX N3 я остэс ия
SFX N3 е оссэ ие
SFX N3 я оссэ ия
SFX N3 е оссэс ие
SFX N3 я оссэс ия
SFX N3 е ослэн ие
SFX N3 я ослэн ия
SFX N3 е осылэн ие
SFX N3 я осылэн ия
SFX N3 е осыдлэн ие
SFX N3 я осыдлэн ия
SFX N3 е осызлэн ие
SFX N3 я осызлэн ия
SFX N3 е осмылэн ие
SFX N3 я осмылэн ия
SFX N3 е остылэн ие
SFX N3 я остылэн ия
SFX N3 е оссылэн ие
SFX N3 я оссылэн ия
SFX N3 е ослэсь ие
SFX N3 я ослэсь ия
SFX N3 е осылэсь ие
SFX N3 я осылэсь ия
SFX N3 е осыдлэсь ие
SFX N3 я осыдлэсь ия
SFX N3 е осызлэсь ие
SFX N3 я осызлэсь ия
SFX N3 е осмылэсь ие
SFX N3 я осмылэсь ия
SFX N3 е остылэсь ие
SFX N3 я остылэсь ия
SFX N3 е оссылэсь ие
SFX N3 я оссылэсь ия
SFX N3 е ослы ие
SFX N3 я ослы ия
SFX N3 е осылы ие
SFX N3 я осылы ия
SFX N3 е осыдлы ие
SFX N3 я осыдлы ия
SFX N3 е осызлы ие
SFX N3 я осызлы ия
SFX N3 е осмылы ие
SFX N3 я осмылы ия
SFX N3 е остылы ие
SFX N3 я остылы ия
SFX N3 е оссылы ие
SFX N3 я оссылы ия
SFX N3 е остэк ие
SFX N3 я остэк ия
SFX N3 е осытэк ие
SFX N3 я осытэк ия
SFX N3 е осыдтэк ие
SFX N3 я осыдтэк ия
SFX N3 е осызтэк ие
SFX N3 я осызтэк ия
SFX N3 е осмытэк ие
SFX N3 я осмытэк ия
SFX N3 е остытэк ие
SFX N3 я остытэк ия
SFX N3 е оссытэк ие
SFX N3 я оссытэк ия
SFX N3 е осъя ие
SFX N3 я осъя ия
SFX N3 е осыя ие
SFX N3 я осыя ия
SFX N3 е осыдъя ие
SFX N3 я осыдъя ия
SFX N3 е осызъя ие
SFX N3 я осызъя ия
SFX N3 е осмыя ие
SFX N3 я осмыя ия
SFX N3 е остыя ие
SFX N3 я остыя ия
SFX N3 е оссыя ие
SFX N3 я оссыя ия
SFX N3 е осын ие
SFX N3 я осын ия
SFX N3 е осынлэсь ие
SFX N3 я осынлэсь ия
SFX N3 е осыным ие
SFX N3 я осыным ия
SFX N3 е осынымы ие
SFX N3 я осынымы ия
SFX N3 е осыныд ие
SFX N3 я осыныд ия
SFX N3 е осыныды ие
SFX N3 я осыныды ия
SFX N3 е осыныз ие
SFX N3 я осыныз ия
SFX N3 е осынызы ие
SFX N3 я осынызы ия
SFX N3 е осам ие
SFX N3 я осам ия
SFX N3 е осамы ие
SFX N3 я осамы ия
SFX N3 е осад ие
SFX N3 я осад ия
SFX N3 е осады ие
SFX N3 я осады ия
SFX N3 е осаз ие
SFX N3 я осаз ия
SFX N3 е осазы ие
SFX N3 я осазы ия
SFX N3 е осысь ие
SFX N3 я осысь ия
SFX N3 е осысьтым ие
SFX N3 я осысьтым ия
SFX N3 е осысьтымы ие
SFX N3 я осысьтымы ия
SFX N3 е осысьтыд ие
SFX N3 я осысьтыд ия
SFX N3 е осысьтыды ие
SFX N3 я осысьтыды ия
SFX N3 е осысьтыз ие
SFX N3 я осысьтыз ия
SFX N3 е осысьтызы ие
SFX N3 я осысьтызы ия
SFX N3 е осысен ие
SFX N3 я осысен ия
SFX N3 е осысеным ие
SFX N3 я осысеным ия
SFX N3 е осысенымы ие
SFX N3 я осысенымы ия
SFX N3 е осысеныд ие
SFX N3 я осысеныд ия
SFX N3 е осысеныды ие
SFX N3 я осысеныды ия
SFX N3 е осысеныз ие
SFX N3 я осысеныз ия
SFX N3 е осысенызы ие
SFX N3 я осысенызы ия
SFX N3 е осэтӥ ие
SFX N3 я осэтӥ ия
SFX N3 е остӥ ие
SFX N3 я остӥ ия
SFX N3 е остӥм ие
SFX N3 я остӥм ия
SFX N3 е остӥмы ие
SFX N3 я остӥмы ия
SFX N3 е остӥд ие
SFX N3 я остӥд ия
SFX N3 е остӥды ие
SFX N3 я остӥды ия
SFX N3 е остӥз ие
SFX N3 я остӥз ия
SFX N3 е остӥзы ие
SFX N3 я остӥзы ия
SFX N3 е ослань ие
SFX N3 я ослань ия
SFX N3 е осылань ие
SFX N3 я осылань ия
SFX N3 е осыдлань ие
SFX N3 я осыдлань ия
SFX N3 е осызлань ие
SFX N3 я осызлань ия
SFX N3 е осмылань ие
SFX N3 я осмылань ия
SFX N3 е остылань ие
SFX N3 я остылань ия
SFX N3 е оссылань ие
SFX N3 я оссылань ия
SFX N3 е осозь ие
SFX N3 я осозь ия
SFX N3 е осыозь ие
SFX N3 я осыозь ия
SFX N3 е осыдозь ие
SFX N3 я осыдозь ия
SFX N3 е осызозь ие
SFX N3 я осызозь ия
SFX N3 е осмыозь ие
SFX N3 я осмыозь ия
SFX N3 е остыозь ие
SFX N3 я остыозь ия
SFX N3 е оссыозь ие
SFX N3 я оссыозь ия
SFX N3 е осозям ие
SFX N3 я осозям ия
SFX N3 е осозямы ие
SFX N3 я осозямы ия
SFX N3 е осозяд ие
SFX N3 я осозяд ия
SFX N3 е осозяды ие
SFX N3 я осозяды ия
SFX N3 е осозяз ие
SFX N3 я осозяз ия
SFX N3 е осозязы ие
SFX N3 я осозязы ия
