static/hunspell/05.11.2023/udm.dic
минвостокразвития/J1N3
Россельхозакадемия/J1N3
Уралаэрогеодезия/J1N3
﻿абазия/N3R2
абсорбция/N3R2
автология/N3R2
агамия/N3R2
аггравация/N3R2
адаптация/N3R2
азотемия/N3R2
аккламация/N3R2
актинидия/N3R2
алейкемия/N3R2
аллотропия/N3R2
альтернация/N3R2
амнезия/N3R2
аналогия/N3R2
андрофобия/N3R2
анизотропия/N3R2
антимония/N3R2
антропософия/N3R2
апология/N3R2
апраксия/N3R2
ареология/N3R2
артрология/N3R2
аспектология/N3R2
астенопия/N3R2
асцидия/N3R2
аудиометрия/N3R2
аутотрансплантация/N3R2
аффинация/N3R2
аэроитнотерапия/N3R2
базофилия/N3R2
баротерапия/N3R2
библиомания/N3R2
биомурация/N3R2
брадителия/N3R2
бувардия/N3R2
вакцинотерапия/N3R2
венепункция/N3R2
вивипария/N3R2
вирусология/N3R2
газификация/N3R2
гарпия/N3R2
гемагглютинация/N3R2
гемиплегия/N3R2
генеалогия/N3R2
герметизация/N3R2
гетеронимия/N3R2
гибернация/N3R2
гидролокация/N3R2
гидрохория/N3R2
гиперемия/N3R2
гипертермия/N3R2
гипогликемия/N3R2
гипосекреция/N3R2
гиппология/N3R2
глоссолалия/N3R2
голотурия/N3R2
гомотипия/N3R2
градация/N3R2
гуттация/N3R2
девастация/N3R2
дедукция/N3R2
декантация/N3R2
декортикация/N3R2
денатурация/N3R2
денситометрия/N3R2
дерматология/N3R2
десмургия/N3R2
дефектология/N3R2
дефростация/N3R2
диахрония/N3R2
дизъюнкция/N3R2
диподия/N3R2
дискретизация/N3R2
диссимиляция/N3R2
дисторсия/N3R2
диффузия/N3R2
евхаристия/N3R2
зоохория/N3R2
изогамия/N3R2
изотропия/N3R2
иммунизация/N3R2
инвагинация/N3R2
индукция/N3R2
инкреция/N3R2
инсталляция/N3R2
интервидение/N3R2
интерпункция/N3R2
интубация/N3R2
ионизация/N3R2
ихнология/N3R2
калориметрия/N3R2
кариогамия/N3R2
каузальгия/N3R2
клейстогамия/N3R2
коллизия/N3R2
комплексонометрия/N3R2
конденсация/N3R2
конскрипция/N3R2
контрацепция/N3R2
конхиология/N3R2
кордегардия/N3R2
космография/N3R2
креолизация/N3R2
криптомнезия/N3R2
ксенотрансплантация/N3R2
кумуляция/N3R2
ламинэктомия/N3R2
латания/N3R2
лейкопения/N3R2
линеаризация/N3R2
литофания/N3R2
локсодромия/N3R2
мадия/N3R2
маммография/N3R2
мастопатия/N3R2
мегаломания/N3R2
мелотипия/N3R2
метамерия/N3R2
механострикция/N3R2
микроминиатюризация/N3R2
микрургия/N3R2
миопия/N3R2
моногамия/N3R2
мотивация/N3R2
нанотехнология/N3R2
нейросекреция/N3R2
нефропатия/N3R2
облитерация/N3R2
олигурия/N3R2
орнитология/N3R2
оториноларингология/N3R2
папирология/N3R2
пария/N3R2
патриархия/N3R2
пептизация/N3R2
пиджинизация/N3R2
пиццерия/N3R2
полиглобулия/N3R2
полифуркация/N3R2
праксиология/N3R2
пролетаризация/N3R2
протерандрия/N3R2
психопатия/N3R2
радионавигация/N3R2
регенерация/N3R2
рекламация/N3R2
реография/N3R2
рестрикция/N3R2
рецессия/N3R2
санация/N3R2
селенодезия/N3R2
сигиллярия/N3R2
синьория/N3R2
сомнология/N3R2
стагфляция/N3R2
стоматология/N3R2
сфенокефалия/N3R2
тахикардия/N3R2
териология/N3R2
токсемия/N3R2
трансплантология/N3R2
туляремия/N3R2
фаготерапия/N3R2
фенокопия/N3R2
филумения/N3R2
фонация/N3R2
фотохромия/N3R2
хемосорбция/N3R2
циклотимия/N3R2
эвтаназия/N3R2
эконометрия/N3R2
экстрадиция/N3R2
электронография/N3R2
эмметропия/N3R2
энуклеация/N3R2
эстезиология/N3R2
разнообразие/N3
автоинспекция/N3
администрация/N3
амбиция/N3
аристократия/N3
аэролиния/N3
биогеоценология/N3
брекчия/N3
вентиляция/N3
радиолиния/N3
водолечение/N3
восхищение/N3
гаттерия/N3
гидрология/N3
госакадемия/N3
двоеточие/N3
демобилизация/N3
диверсия/N3
дознание/N3
епархия/N3
задание/N3
злодеяние/N3
издание/N3
индустриализация/N3
интродукция/N3
кавалерия/N3
категория/N3
классификация/N3
комизация/N3
конкреция/N3
концепция/N3
кулинария/N3
лилия/N3
машиностроение/N3
металлургия/N3
миссия/N3
музыкотерапия/N3
направление/N3
начисление/N3
обнажение/N3
обществознание/N3
онкология/N3
орография/N3
отличие/N3
палеогеография/N3
паспортизация/N3
петиция/N3
поведение/N3
поколение/N3
полуколония/N3
постановление/N3
предание/N3
преступление/N3
приседание/N3
проекция/N3
профобразование/N3
равнение/N3
разногласие/N3
распределение/N3
регистрация/N3
репрессия/N3
саморазвитие/N3
селекция/N3
сказание/N3
соболезнование/N3
сомнение/N3
соцучреждение/N3
сретение/N3
стройиндустрия/N3
творение/N3
техинспекция/N3
традиция/N3
убеждение/N3
уложение/N3
учение/N3
физиология/N3
форсайт-сессия/N3
химия/N3
шахтоуправление/N3
экспозиция/N3
эмоция/N3
этноиндустрия/N3
радиоредакция/N3
микобактерия/N3R1
залужение/N3R1
Албания/T3N3
Балтия/T3N3
Бразилия/T3N3
Виргиния/T3N3
Гран-Канария/T3N3
Зария/T3N3
Ичкерия/T3N3
Кастилия/T3N3
Латвия/T3N3
Маньчжурия/T3N3
Московия/T3N3
Пария/T3N3
Рипейские/T3N3
Скотия/T3N3
Урмия/T3N3
Христиания/T3N3
Этолия/T3N3
